North Dakota, session 69, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Auto glass coverage.
1. An insurer offering automobile comprehensive or collision coverage policies must
provide at least one policy which provides additional coverage for the repair or
replacement of damaged auto glass.
2. Auto glass coverage must provide an additional separate deductible or a predeductible
for the replacement of auto glass.
Page No. 1 25.0528.01000